Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2120XC (2) 91 ll/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. A county shall not adopt or enforce an 3 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment imposing a fee in 4 order to obtain a pet license. 5 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. A city shall not adopt or enforce an 8 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment imposing a fee in 9 order to obtain a pet license. 10